Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2929.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Perimenopause and menopause task force; membership; compensation; reports; delayed repeal A. The legislative perimenopause and menopause task force is established consisting of the following members: 1. The director of the department of health services or the director's designee. 2. One member who is a physician licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, Arizona Revised Statutes, who is a member of a statewide physician organization, whose practice focuses on treating women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. One member who is a registered nurse practitioner licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, Arizona Revised Statutes, whose practice treats women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 4. One member who is a physician licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 17, Arizona Revised Statutes, whose practice focuses on treating women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 5. One member who is a certified nurse midwife who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, Arizona Revised Statutes, who treats women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 6. One member who represents an association of obstetricians and gynecologists in this state, who treats women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 7. One member who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17, Arizona Revised Statutes, who practices family medicine, whose practice treats women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the governor. 8. One member who represents a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents, who is part of the department of obstetrics and gynecology at the university and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives 9. One member who represents community colleges in this state and who is appointed by the governor. 10. One member who represents a behavioral health practice that treats women in perimenopause and menopause and who is appointed by the governor. 11. One member who represents an alliance of hospital systems in this state and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 12. One member who represents a statewide association representing hospitals and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 13. One member who represents community health centers in this state and who is appointed by the governor. 14. One member who represents a tribal health system and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 15. One member who represents a health plan that is contracted with the Arizona health care cost containment system, who has experience implementing health care education programs and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 16. One member who represents the insurance industry in this state and who is appointed by the governor. B. The task force shall elect a chairperson and shall meet at the call of the chairperson.  The task force shall meet at least one time each year. C. Members of the task force are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The task force shall: 1. Identify ways to enhance the treatment and education of women experiencing perimenopause and menopause. 2. Review existing health care education standards and curricula related to perimenopause and menopause and develop nonbinding recommendations, competency frameworks or guidance that may be considered by educational institutions, accreditation bodies and licensing boards, as appropriate. 3. Examine how, if necessary, health professionals and health care institutions may be compensated for care they provide that relates to perimenopause or menopause. 4. On or before December 31, 2027 and December 31, 2028, report the task force's findings to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the chairpersons of the house of representatives and senate health and human service committees, or their successor committees. E. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2029.